New York, session 2025-2026, A3246.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 9 of section 208 of the tax 2 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 28 to read as follows: 3 (28) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 4 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 5 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. 6 § 2. Subdivision 9 of section 208 of the tax law is amended by adding 7 a new paragraph (u) to read as follows: 8 (u) For tax years beginning on or after January first, two thousand 9 twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of property with respect to which 10 the taxpayer has made the election under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 11 (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code, 12 the basis of such property under this article shall be determined as if 13 the taxpayer had not made such election. 14 § 3. Subsection (b) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by adding 15 a new paragraph 44 to read as follows: 16 (44) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 17 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 18 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. 19 § 4. Section 612 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 20 (y) to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02005-01-5 A. 3246 2 1 (y) Qualified opportunity zones. For tax years beginning on or after 2 January first, two thousand twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of 3 property with respect to which the taxpayer has made the election under 4 subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 5 of the internal revenue code, the basis of such property under this 6 article shall be determined as if the taxpayer had not made such 7 election. 8 § 5. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (b) of section 1503 of the tax law is 9 amended by adding a new subparagraph (AA) to read as follows: 10 (AA) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 11 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 12 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. 13 § 6. Section 1503 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subdivi- 14 sion (d) to read as follows: 15 (d) For tax years beginning on or after January first, two thousand 16 twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of property with respect to which 17 the taxpayer has made the election under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 18 (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code, 19 the basis of such property under this article shall be determined as if 20 the taxpayer had not made such election. 21 § 7. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 8 of section 11-602 of the adminis- 22 trative code of the city of New York is amended by adding a new subpara- 23 graph 23 to read as follows: 24 (23) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 25 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 26 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. 27 § 8. Section 11-602 of the administrative code of the city of New York 28 is amended by adding a new subdivision 11 to read as follows: 29 11. For tax years beginning on or after January first, two thousand 30 twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of property with respect to which 31 the taxpayer has made the election under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 32 (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code, 33 the basis of such property under this article shall be determined as if 34 the taxpayer had not made such election. 35 § 9. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 8 of section 11-652 of the adminis- 36 trative code of the city of New York is amended by adding a new subpara- 37 graph 24 to read as follows: 38 (24) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 39 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 40 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. 41 § 10. Subdivision 8 of section 11-652 of the administrative code of 42 the city of New York is amended by adding a new paragraph (u) to read as 43 follows: 44 (u) For tax years beginning on or after January first, two thousand 45 twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of property with respect to which 46 the taxpayer has made the election under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 47 (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code, 48 the basis of such property under this article shall be determined as if 49 the taxpayer had not made such election. 50 § 11. Subdivision (b) of section 11-1712 of the administrative code of 51 the city of New York is amended by adding a new paragraph 40 to read as 52 follows: 53 (40) the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income for the 54 taxable year by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 55 section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code. A. 3246 3 1 § 12. Section 11-1712 of the administrative code of the city of New 2 York is amended by adding a new subdivision (w) to read as follows: 3 (w) For tax years beginning on or after January first, two thousand 4 twenty-six, upon the sale or exchange of property with respect to which 5 the taxpayer has made the election under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 6 (1) of subsection (a) of section 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code, 7 the basis of such property under this article shall be determined as if 8 the taxpayer had not made such election. 9 § 13. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxa- 10 ble years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.